New York, session 2025-2026, A9683.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 301 of the agriculture and markets 2 law is amended by adding a new paragraph n to read as follows: 3 n. Purpose-bred animals, including but not limited to: (i) all types 4 of working dogs as defined in section ninety of the state law, including 5 but not limited to: (A) law enforcement dogs, including but not limited 6 to detection dogs, police work dogs, dogs used by the military, protec- 7 tive security and working search dogs, as such terms are defined in 8 section one hundred eight of this chapter; (B) personal service dogs, 9 including but not limited to service dogs, therapy dogs, guide dogs and 10 hearing dogs as those terms are defined in section one hundred eight of 11 this chapter; and (C) livestock and wildlife control dogs, which for 12 purposes of this article shall include any dog that is trained to herd 13 and/or protect livestock or control bird and/or wildlife populations and 14 is actually or has been used for such purposes; (ii) other service 15 animals as defined in section one hundred twenty-three-b of this chap- 16 ter; and (iii) any research animal, which for purposes of this article 17 shall include any animal that is raised or maintained specifically for 18 the purpose of regulated biomedical research to promote the health and 19 wellness of humans or animals. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06720-04-6